Louisiana, session 2026, SB339.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:147.3 and 705.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§147.3. Authority to obtain criminal history record information
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that it is vitally important
to the public safety, interest, and welfare of the state to protect Louisiana
residents and their residences, businesses, and other property, as well as visitors
to the state, by reasonably regulating the licensing of persons participating in
the horse racing industry in the state.
B. As used in this Section:
(1) "Bureau" means the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
Information of the office of state police within the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections.
(2) "Commission" means the Louisiana State Racing Commission.
(3) "Criminal history record information" means all state records of
arrest, prosecution, and conviction, including those that have been expunged or
dismissed pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894, and
national records which include fingerprints of the applicant and other
identifying information, if so requested by the commission.
(4) "FBI" means the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the United States
Department of Justice.
(5) "Licensee" means any person, partnership, corporation, or business
entity receiving a license, permit, or privilege from the commission to conduct
a race meeting or meetings.
C.(1) Pursuant to this Section, the commission may request and obtain
state and national criminal history record information from the bureau and the
FBI regarding each applicant.
(2) Notwithstanding Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the commission's
use of fingerprints shall be for the limited purpose of determining the eligibility
of each applicant and conducting directly related matters in accordance with
the suitability standards outlined in R.S. 4:150.
(3) The commission shall be entitled to the criminal history record and
identification files of the bureau of any person who is licensed or who is
applying to be licensed. Fingerprints and other identifying information of the
applicant shall be submitted to the bureau, and the bureau shall, upon request
of the commission and after receipt of the fingerprint card and other identifying
information from the applicant, make available to the commission all arrest and
conviction information contained in the bureau's criminal history record and
identification files. In addition, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the
bureau to the FBI for a national criminal history record check.
(4) In accordance with the authority provided for in this Chapter, the
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
costs of providing the information required by this Section shall be charged by
the bureau, as specified in R.S. 15:587, for furnishing information contained in
the bureau's criminal history record and identification files, including any
additional costs of providing the national criminal history record check, which
pertains to the individual. All costs or fees for furnishing the information may
be imposed on the individual.
D. All criminal history record information obtained by the commission
shall be available for review by the Louisiana Department of Justice as part of
an application for a license. The authority of this agency directly related to the
issuance of licenses is provided for in R.S. 4:146.
* * *
§705.1. Authority to obtain criminal history record information
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that it is vitally important
to the public safety, interest, and welfare of the state to protect Louisiana
residents and their residences, businesses, and other property, as well as visitors
to the state, by reasonably regulating the licensing of persons performing
charitable gaming activity in the state.
B. As used in this Section:
(1) "Bureau" means the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Information of the office of state police within the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections.
(2) "Criminal history record information" means all state records of
arrest, prosecution, and conviction, including those that have been expunged or
dismissed pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894, and
national records which include fingerprints of the applicant and other
identifying information, if so requested by the office.
(3) "FBI" means the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the United States
Department of Justice.
(4) "Licensee" means any person applying for a license with the office.
(5) "Office" means the Louisiana office of charitable gaming.
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
C.(1) Pursuant to this Section, the office may request and obtain state
and national criminal history record information from the bureau and the FBI
regarding each applicant.
(2) Notwithstanding Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the office's use of
fingerprints shall be for the limited purpose of determining the eligibility of
each applicant and conducting directly related matters in accordance with the
suitability standards outlined in R.S. 4:704, 705, 708, and 718.
(3) The office shall be entitled to the criminal history record and
identification files of the bureau of any person who is licensed or who is
applying to be licensed. Fingerprints and other identifying information of the
applicant shall be submitted to the bureau, and the bureau shall, upon request
of the office and after receipt of the fingerprint card and other identifying
information from the applicant, make available to the office all arrest and
conviction information contained in the bureau's criminal history record and
identification files. In addition, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the
bureau to the FBI for a national criminal history record check.
(4) In accordance with the authority provided for in this Chapter, the
costs of providing the information required by this Section shall be charged by
the bureau, as specified in R.S. 15:587, for furnishing information contained in
the bureau's criminal history record and identification files, including any
additional costs of providing the national criminal history record check, which
pertains to the individual. All costs or fees for furnishing the information may
be imposed on the individual.
D. All criminal history record information obtained by the office shall
be available for review by the Louisiana Department of Justice as part of an
application for a license. The authority of this agency directly related to the
issuance of licenses is provided for in R.S. 4:736.
Section 2. R.S. 15:587(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§587. Duty to provide information; processing fees; Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
* * *
C.(1) The bureau shall, upon request and after receipt of fingerprint cards or,
either physically or electronically, or using other identifying information from the
office of state police, make available to the state police gaming division, the
Louisiana Gaming Control Board, the Louisiana Lottery Corporation, the office of
charitable gaming, and the Louisiana State Racing Commission, survey information
contained in the bureau's criminal history record and identification files, which
pertains to an applicant or prospective employee of any of them. In addition, in order
to determine an applicant's suitability for a gaming or employee license or permit
under the provisions of law found in Titles 4, 9, 27, 40, and 47 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, for each applicant fingerprinted, the fingerprints and
thereafter make a request of the Federal Bureau of Investigation for like
information from other jurisdictions to search for criminal history records. The
bureau shall make such information available to:
(a) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state
police, gaming enforcement division, for the purposes of determining
employment suitability under the provisions as provided for in R.S. 27:20, 20.1,
28, 234, 235, and 427.
(b) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state
police, gaming enforcement division, for the purposes of licensing vendors or
retailers, or for determining employment suitability at the request of the
Louisiana Lottery Corporation under the provisions as provided for in R.S.
47:9065.
(c) The office of charitable gaming, for the purpose of determining
suitability for licensing under the provisions as provided for in R.S. 4:704, 705,
and 708.
(d) The Louisiana State Racing Commission, for the purpose of
determining suitability for licensing under the provisions as provided for in R.S.
4:147.3 and 150.
(2) Each applicant shall be fingerprinted, and the fingerprints and any
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
other identification information as may be required shall be forwarded to the
bureau and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a state and national criminal
history record check.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 27:15(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 27:20.1 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§15. Board's authority; responsibilities
* * *
B. The board shall:
(1)(a) Have all regulatory authority, control, and jurisdiction, including
investigation, licensing, and enforcement, and all power incidental or necessary to
such regulatory authority, control, and jurisdiction over all aspects of gaming
activities and operations as authorized pursuant to the provisions of the Louisiana
Riverboat Economic Development and Gaming Control Act, the Louisiana
Economic Development and Gaming Corporation Act, the Video Draw Poker
Devices Control Law, the Louisiana Fantasy Sports Contests Act, and the Louisiana
Sports Wagering Act, except as otherwise specified in this Title. Further, the board
shall have all regulatory, enforcement, and supervisory authority which exists in the
state as to gaming on Indian lands as provided in the provisions of Act No. 888 of
the 1990 Regular Session of the Legislature and Act No. 817 of the 1993 Regular
Session of the Legislature.
(b) In exercising its authority, the board shall require every applicant for
a license, permit, and any person required to be found suitable under this Title,
to submit a full set of fingerprints to the division for the purpose of a
fingerprint-based national criminal history record check. The division shall
forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national
criminal history check. The board and the division shall be the designated
recipients of the results of the national criminal history record check.
* * *
§20.1. Authority to obtain criminal history record information
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that it is vitally important
to the public safety, interest, and welfare to this state to protect Louisiana
residents and their residences, businesses, and other property, as well as visitors
to the state, by reasonably regulating the permitting, licensing, or employment
of persons performing gaming activity in the state.
B. As used in this Section:
(1) "Bureau" means the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Information of the office of state police within the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections.
(2) "Criminal history record information" means all state records of
arrest, prosecution, and conviction, including those that have been expunged or
dismissed pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894, and
national records which include fingerprints of the applicant and other
identifying information, if so requested by the board.
(3) "Division" means the Louisiana Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, office of state police, gaming enforcement division.
(4) "FBI" means the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the United States
Department of Justice.
(5) "Permit" means any permit, license, or authorization, or associated
application, issued pursuant to the provisions of this Title.
(6) "Permittee" means any person who is issued or applying for a permit
pursuant to the provisions of this Title.
C.(1) Pursuant to this Section, the division may request and obtain state
and national criminal history record information from the bureau and the FBI
regarding each applicant.
(2) Notwithstanding Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the division's use
of fingerprints shall be for the limited purpose of determining the eligibility of
each applicant and conducting directly related matters in accordance with the
suitability standards outlined in R.S. 27:28, 234, 235, 306, 427, and 604.
(3) The division shall be entitled to the criminal history record and
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
identification files of the bureau of any person who is permitted, licensed, or
employed, or who is applying to be permitted, licensed, or employed.
Fingerprints and other identifying information of the applicant shall be
submitted to the bureau, and the bureau shall, upon request of the board and
after receipt of the fingerprint card and other identifying information from the
applicant, make available to the division all arrest and conviction information
contained in the bureau's criminal history record and identification files. In
addition, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the bureau to the FBI for a
national criminal history record check.
(4) In accordance with the authority provided for in this Chapter, the
costs of providing the information required by this Section shall be charged by
the bureau, as specified in R.S. 15:587, for furnishing information contained in
the bureau's criminal history record and identification files, including any
additional costs of providing the national criminal history record check, which
pertains to the individual. All costs or fees for furnishing the information may
be imposed on the individual.
D. All criminal history record information obtained by the division shall
be available for review by the board and the Louisiana Department of Justice
as part of an application for a license, permit, or employment. The authority of
this agency directly related to the issuance of licenses or permits is provided for
in R.S. 27:15 and 19.
E.(1) Criminal history record information shall be considered
confidential information under R.S. 27:21, and the board, its members, its
employees, and any agent authorized to act on behalf of the board shall use the
criminal history record information exclusively to evaluate the applicant's
eligibility or disqualification.
Section 4. R.S. 47:9065(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:9065(C)
and (D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9065. Criminal background investigations; duties of corporation or its security
division
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
* * *
B. The gaming enforcement division shall submit the names of applicants
for licensure as vendors or retailers and potential employees to the Louisiana
Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information of the office of state police
within the Department of Public Safety and Corrections for criminal
background checks pursuant to R.S. 15:587. Upon the gaming enforcement
division's submission of a licensing applicant's fingerprints and such other
identifying information as may be required, the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information shall survey its criminal history records and
identification files and make a simultaneous request to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for similar information from other jurisdictions to search for
criminal history records. The Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and
Information may charge the corporation or the applicant a reasonable
processing fee for conducting and reporting on any such search.
C. The gaming enforcement division may share the results of the
criminal history record information with the Louisiana Lottery Corporation,
as they are a related agency and shall use the information to determine
eligibility in accordance with the provisions of R.S.15:587 and Subsection D of
this Section.
D. The corporation or its division of security shall:
(1) Conduct criminal background investigations and credit investigations on
all potential retailers and investigate all potential employees of the corporation not
referred to in Subsection A of this Section or not investigated by the office of state
police.
(2) Supervise ticket validation and lottery drawings.
(3) Inspect at times determined solely by the division the facilities of any
vendor in order to determine the integrity of the vendor's product and in order to
determine whether the vendor is in compliance with its contract.
(4) Report any suspected violations of this Subtitle to the appropriate district
attorney, or the attorney general and law enforcement agencies.
Page 9 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 339 ENROLLED
(5) Upon request, provide assistance to any district attorney, the attorney
general, or law enforcement agency investigating a violation of this Subtitle.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.